Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 95 The Recovery High Schools Act
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-95-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Recovery High Schools Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 388, § 1.

16-95-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meaning unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Recovery High School” means a public school or a special education program licensed by RIDE that: (i) Serves students diagnosed with substance use disorder or dependency, as defined by the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders IV-TR; and (ii) Provides both comprehensive four (4) year high school education and a structured plan of recovery.

“Board of regents” means the Rhode Island board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

“Commissioner” means the Rhode Island commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

“RIDE” means the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education.

“Sending school district” means the district where the student attending or planning to attend a recovery high school resides, and that, upon recommendation of a clinician licensed pursuant to chapter 42-35, refers the student for enrollment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 388, § 1.

16-95-3.
Recovery high schools established.

The commissioner is hereby authorized to create a pilot recovery high school for the purposes of demonstrating the effectiveness of this model in Rhode Island. Any currently licensed entities eligible to establish a recovery high school, as defined in subdivision

16-93-2(1)

, may submit a proposal to operate a pilot recovery high school to the commissioner no later than December 1st of the school year before the school year in which the recovery high school is to begin operation. The approval of the board of regents shall be required in order for the recovery high school to begin operation.

By approval of the proposal upon the recommendation of the commissioner, the board of regents will be deemed to have authorized all necessary variances from regulations enumerated in the proposal.

After two (2) years of operation, the pilot recovery high school will be required to submit an analysis demonstrating the educational outcomes, including, but not limited to, graduation rates, retention rates, course performance, and performance on the state assessment attained through the pilot to the commissioner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 388, § 1.

16-95-4.
Transfer of aid.

Any school district in Rhode Island that may have a student, or students, who are currently or were last enrolled in said district and who are diagnosed with substance use disorder or dependency, as defined by the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders IV-TR, may be referred to a Rhode Island recovery high school by a clinician licensed pursuant to chapter 69 of title 5 for voluntary enrollment in such school. If said student is admitted to said school, the sending school district shall ensure that payment, pursuant to subsection (b) for students who attend the recovery high school, is paid, and further, that upon completion of all other graduation requirements, said student or students shall receive a diploma.

A sending school district shall transfer the per-pupil core-instructional amount, pursuant to chapter 7.2 of title 16 (“The Education Equity and Property Tax Relief Act”) to a recovery high school for any student attending the recovery high school and meeting the following criteria: (1) The student is currently enrolled in the district or currently resides in the municipality in which the district is located; (2) The student is considered by a clinician, licensed pursuant to chapter 69 of title 5, to be clinically appropriate, using the criteria for substance use disorders as defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders IV-TR; and (3) The student meets all matriculation criteria as outlined by the sending district and the department of elementary and secondary education, with determination of academic eligibility based on existing documentation provided by the district. The district and the recovery high school shall arrange to confer a diploma when a student completes state- and district-mandated graduation requirements.

The state shall appropriate no less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for the administration and programmatic costs of each recovery high school.

A recovery high school shall submit to the council on elementary and secondary education academic data considered necessary by the council to provide information regarding each student’s academic performance, subject to applicable health confidentiality laws and regulations.

The council on elementary and secondary education, in consultation with the department of behavioral health, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement and carry out the intent of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 11, § 8; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 12, § 2.